Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 7 Foreign Vehicles

31-7-1.
Right to operate on foreign registration.

A nonresident owner, except as otherwise provided in §§

31-7-2

and

31-7-3

, owning any foreign vehicle of a type otherwise subject to registration pursuant to this title, may operate or permit the operation of that vehicle within this state without registering the vehicle in, or paying any fees to, this state subject to the condition that the vehicle at all times, when operated in this state, is duly registered in, and displays upon it, a valid registration card and registration plate or plates issued for that vehicle in the place of residence of that owner.

Any foreign vehicle(s) parked or garaged overnight in this state for more than thirty (30) days in the aggregate in any one year that is owned and/or operated by a resident of this state as defined in §

31-1-18

shall register the vehicle(s) and pay the same fee that is required with reference to like vehicle(s) owned by residents of this state. The state police and local police departments, upon observation of a foreign-registered vehicle present within the state for thirty (30) days or more shall identify the owner of the vehicle and, if a Rhode Island resident, provide a notice containing a copy of this section to the owner and to the tax assessor in the city or town in which the vehicle is located.

Any domiciled resident of this state who owns a vehicle that is registered in another state shall file an annual report with the administrator of the division of motor vehicles of this state and with the tax assessor of the city or town in which the domiciled resident resides, stating the make, model, year, and validation of the vehicle and the reason for registering the vehicle in the foreign state. Failure to comply with the terms of this subsection shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for every foreign vehicle. This provision shall not apply to military personnel assigned to duty outside of the state of Rhode Island and for a period of thirty (30) days after discharge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 5, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-7-1

; P.L. 1982, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 403, § 1.

31-7-2.
Vehicles transporting persons or property for compensation.

A nonresident owner of a foreign vehicle operated within this state for the transportation of persons or property for compensation or for the transportation of merchandise, either regularly according to a schedule or for a consecutive period exceeding thirty (30) days, shall register the vehicle and pay the same fees for it as is required for like vehicles owned by residents of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 5, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-7-2

.

31-7-3.
Nonresidents carrying on business in state.

Every nonresident, including any foreign corporation carrying on business within this state and owning and regularly operating in the business any motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer within this state, shall be required to register each vehicle and pay the same fees for it as is required for like vehicles owned by residents of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 5, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-7-3

.

31-7-4.
Reciprocity.

The provisions of §

31-7-1

shall be operative as to a nonresident owner or operator only to the extent that, under the laws of his or her residence or licensing country, state, territory, or district, like privileges are granted to motor vehicle owners resident of and registered under the laws of this state or operators licensed under the laws of this state. The division of motor vehicles shall finally determine the extent of the privileges granted to nonresident owners and operators of motor vehicles in the registration of motor vehicles and licenses of operators. The division of motor vehicles is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements on behalf of the state with the appropriate authorities of any state in the United States of America or of the District of Columbia with respect to all fees or taxes imposed by this state and by any other state or the District of Columbia on motor vehicles, on the operation of motor vehicles, or on any transaction incident to the operation of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 5, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-7-4

.

31-7-5.
Suspension or revocation of rights of nonresidents.

Whenever the division of motor vehicles shall suspend or revoke the right of any nonresident person to operate any motor vehicle, or to have operated any motor vehicle, owned by any nonresident upon the public highways of this state, it shall suspend or revoke that right for the same periods of time and upon the same grounds that it is required to suspend or revoke the license of any chauffeur or operator by §§

31-11-6

,

31-11-7

,

31-11-8

, and

31-11-18

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 5, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-7-5

; P.L. 1959 (s.s.), ch. 190, § 1.

31-7-6.
Long arm jurisdiction.

The acceptance by a nonresident of the rights and privileges conferred by chapters 1 — 27 of this title, as evidenced by the operation of a motor vehicle by the nonresident, his or her servant or agent, or the operation by a nonresident, his or her servant or agent, of a motor vehicle on a public highway in this state other than under said chapters, shall be deemed equivalent to an appointment by the nonresident of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or his or her successor in office, to be the nonresident’s true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful processes in any action or proceeding against the nonresident or his or her executor or administrator, growing out of any accident or collision in which the nonresident, his or her servant or agent, may be involved while operating a motor vehicle within this state. Acceptance or operation by the nonresident shall be deemed a signification of the nonresident’s agreement that any such process against the nonresident or his or her executor or administrator which is served as provided in this chapter shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served on the nonresident personally.

This section shall also apply to a foreign corporation and to any resident of the state who becomes a nonresident prior to the commencement of an action against the corporation or resident, or his or her executor or administrator, growing out of any accident or collision in which that person or his or her agent may have been involved while operating a motor vehicle within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 5, § 2; art. 19, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-7-6

; P.L. 1966, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 78, § 3.

31-7-7.
Service on nonresident.

Service of process on a nonresident shall be made by leaving a copy of the process with a fee of five dollars ($5.00) in the hands of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or in his or her office with some one acting in his or her stead as the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and the service shall be sufficient service upon the nonresident.

Notice of the service and a copy of the process shall be sent by registered or certified mail prior to service or immediately after service by the plaintiff or his or her attorney of record, to the defendant at the address given upon the defendant’s registration or operator’s license. The sender’s post office receipt of sending and the plaintiff’s or his or her attorney’s affidavit of compliance are to be returned with the process in accordance with applicable procedural rules.

Notwithstanding the requirements in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, however, once service has been made on the administrator of the division of motor vehicles as provided in this section, the court shall have the authority in the event of the failure to comply with the requirement of notice to the nonresident to order any notice that shall be sufficient to apprise the nonresident of the pendency of the suit against him or her, and in addition may extend the time for answering by the nonresident. It is also sufficient if notice and a copy of the process are served upon the defendant outside the state in accordance with applicable procedural rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 5, § 2; art. 19, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-7-7

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 7; P.L. 1961, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 78, § 4.

31-7-8.
Process fee as costs — Record of processes.

The fee of five dollars ($5.00) paid by the plaintiff to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, or in the administrator’s office, at the time of the service shall be taxed in the plaintiff’s costs if he or she prevails in the suit. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall keep a record of all processes served on nonresidents which shall show the day and hour of service and pay to the general treasurer all fees so paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 3595, art. 5, § 2; art. 19, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-7-8

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 7.

31-7-9.
Offenses — Nonresident bond posting.

Every nonresident operator, who is charged by a member of the state police or by a member of the police department of any city or town of this state with a violation of any provision of chapters 14, 15, and 16 of this title, except for a violation included under chapter 41 of this title, may be required to deposit in escrow the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), or to post a proper bond for that amount, with the state or local police department preferring the charge as a prerequisite to the nonresident operator being released for appearance at a later date before the court of proper jurisdiction upon the charge. The deposit so posted shall be returned to the nonresident, or the bond so posted shall be cancelled, upon the nonresident’s appearance before the court of proper jurisdiction for the disposition of the offense charged and effectuation of sentence, if any. If the nonresident shall fail to appear before the court of proper jurisdiction on the date and at the time assigned for the disposition of the offense charged, the deposit or bond, as the case may be, shall be forfeited and paid over to the clerk of court to be disbursed as if the defendant had been convicted and a fine and costs equal to that sum had been imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 177, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 14.